Washington statutes.
RCW 38.38.668

[Art. 87] Missing movement.

Any person subject to this code who through neglect or design misses the movement of a ship, aircraft, or unit with which he or she is required in the course of duty to move shall be punished as a court martial may direct.

[ 2011 c 336 s 778; 1963 c 220 s 86.]